Utah statutes.
26A-1-110.   Local health officer -- Powers and duties -- Vacancy.

(1)  The board shall appoint a local health officer and determine the officer's compensation:

(a)  subject to ratification by the county executive of the county or counties in the local health department; and

(b)  as provided by:

(i)  ordinance adopted by a county creating a county health department; or

(ii)  the interlocal agreement pursuant to which a multicounty health department is created.

(2)  The local health officer shall:

(a)  have the qualifications of training and experience for that office equivalent to those approved by the department  for local health officers;

(b)  be the administrative and executive officer of the local health department and devote full time to the duties of  the office;

(c)  if provisions have been made with the  department, act as the local registrar of vital statistics  within the local health department's boundaries without additional compensation or payment of fees provided by law;

(d) (i)  prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, prepare an annual budget approved by the board and present it:

(A)  to the county legislative body if the local health department is a county health department; or

(B)  to the entity designated in the interlocal agreement creating the local health department if the local health department is a multicounty health department; and

(ii)  obtain final approval of the annual budget from the governing bodies designated in Subsection (2)(d)(i)(A) or (B) after the governing body either:

(A)  reviews and approves the budget; or

(B)  amends and approves the budget; and

(e)  prepare an annual report and provide it to the department and all counties in the local health department.

(3)  The report under Subsection (2)(e) shall contain a copy of the independent financial audit required under Section 26A-1-115, a description of the population served by the local health department, and other information as requested by the board or the county or counties creating the local health department.

(4)  In the absence or disability of the local health officer, or if there is a vacancy in that office, the board shall appoint an acting health officer for a temporary period not to exceed one year.  The appointment shall be ratified by the county executive of the county or counties in the local health department.



Amended by Chapter 131, 2003 General Session

